Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1081.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1750.1-A. Moratorium on buildings. (a) Cyber charter school.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection, a cyber charter school may not own, purchase or lease property.(b) Educational management service provider.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection, an educational management service provider may not own, purchase or lease property on behalf of a cyber charter school.12345678910111213141516171819 (c) Applicability.--Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to property owned, purchased or leased on or before the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1081PN1199 - 2 - 1234